Privacy Policy
We design and operate our technology and services with our users’ protection and privacy in mind, and we make every effort to be transparent in our data collection and use practices.
Our flagship education products include individual accounts that enable schools and parents to keep track of individual student learning and maintain control over their student data.
We do not use student or children’s personal information for advertising purposes, including targeted advertising.
We do not rent or sell student data.
BrainPOP uses industry standard protocol to ensure that student data is encrypted and transmitted securely from end to end and at rest.
We limit the data collected from students or children to only that which is necessary to meet the educational purposes of BrainPOP.
We do not collect sensitive data like biometric or health data.
Students cannot interact with other users outside their school, classroom or family account. The product is not intended and does not allow for social interactions between students.
Districts, schools and homeschools are able to delete student personally identifiable information at any time.
We are proud supporters of the
K-12 School Service Provider Pledge to Safeguard Student Privacy.
We provide prominent notice to users and send out email notices to customers before making any material changes to our Privacy Policy.
BrainPOP complies with the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA).
BrainPOP agrees to operate as a school official as the term is used in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA), and operates at the direct control of our school and district customers with respect to our use and handling of their student records.
Privacy Questions?
If you have questions or complaints regarding our privacy policy or practices, please contact us at
privacy@brainpop.com
.
Privacy Policy
Last updated July 21, 2024.
This privacy policy applies to all the BrainPOP and its affiliates (“BrainPOP”) owned and operated websites, professional learning services, and mobile applications (which we collectively refer to as “Services”). By accessing or using our Services, you agree to the terms of this Privacy Policy.
Definitions
For purposes of this policy, we will use the following definitions:
Personally identifiable information (PII)
is information that can identify a user of the Services, including his or her e-mail, name, and address. It also includes PII combined with non-PII.
De-identified information
is information from which personally identifiable components have been removed and a reasonable determination made that an individual is not identifiable.
Student Records
are records that are directly related to a student and maintained by BrainPOP on behalf of a school or district subscriber.
What Type of Information Do We Collect and Why?
Education Product Subscribers:
Information collected during the subscription process:
During the registration process for any of our subscriptions, we ask the subscriber to provide us with a name, email address, school or district affiliation (when applicable), phone number, and billing information. We may also ask you to provide username and password. We use the information to create and service the account, fulfill the subscription and send you service-related announcements. For instance, we may send emails about routine maintenance, new feature launches or product recommendations related to your subscription. We may also use this contact information to request feedback on our products and services, to inform future customer service and product improvements. If you are registering for a free trial, we will use the information to create a free trial account and to send occasional promotional emails and other marketing campaigns. You may opt out of promotional email messaging at any time as described in the Opt Out section below.
BrainPOP at Schools:
Whether engaging with BrainPOP through a free trial or a paid subscription, schools or districts are required to appoint an administrator (“Administrator”), who is authorized by the school or the district to be responsible for the Students Records.
Each school or district Administrator has access to a dashboard that allows them to create, update, review, modify and delete individual accounts, and monitor logins within the individual accounts.
To create the teacher accounts, we require a full name, email address, class name, and a password security question. We also use the email address to send product updates and use recommendations, password recovery information, effectiveness and efficacy data, invitations to participate in surveys and research and more (messaging may not be available in all jurisdictions). An unsubscribe option is included in promotional messaging.
If a school or district uses and accesses individual accounts through any of the single sign on services that we support, we collect the information we use for the individual accounts function from the third party integrated service.
Students:
Students accounts can be created by the school, the district, or by the teachers, or the teacher can invite the students to create the accounts using a class code provided by the teacher. We collect students’ full name, class, graduation year/grade, username, password and may collect student school email addresses and other teacher and student unique identifiers for certain single sign on services login integrations. Students will be able to store their activities, quizzes, answers, movies and other projects they’ve created and correspondences with their teachers within their individual accounts. We collect student’s voice-recording if they use the recording feature in Make-a-Movie® and we use students' answers in certain AI based features (to learn about our AI features, see section below). Students cannot interact with other users outside their school or classroom subscription. Students’ PII is not posted publicly. Student emails shall only be used for the purposes of providing login integration. We will not send emails to students, for any reason.
BrainPOP at Home:
To create a family subscription for home use, parents or legal guardians are asked to provide their full name, email address and other minimally required personal information.
For family subscriptions that permit individual accounts, we also ask parents or guardians for their children’s name (first or full name, depending on product),  graduation year/grade, username, password and security question(s),  an avatar image, when applicable. We use this information to create the individual child accounts. Some of the family subscriptions allow children to store their activities, quizzes, movies and other projects they created, and badges or goals they have achieved, and the Homeschool subscription allows for children to correspond with the parent/guardian within the Services. Children cannot interact with other users outside their family or homeschool subscription. Children PII is not posted publicly.
Parents or guardians subscribing to the family products will receive occasional emails with information about usage of the accounts, new features, product use recommendations, effectiveness and efficacy testing, backup schedules, survey and research participation invitation and more. An opt-out will be included at the bottom of promotional messaging.
Children under Age 13:
In compliance with the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), BrainPOP does not collect personally identifiable information from children under 13, without a parent or guardian's consent, or that of a school if applicable. Parents and guardians of children under 13 who use any of the BrainPOP products have certain rights under COPPA and BrainPOP recognizes those rights. At any time, parents/guardians using a home product may request to review the personal information we collected from their child, request that we make no further use of that information or request that we delete it. To exercise your right to delete information, please use the contact information below. Parents/guardians of children using BrainPOP through a school account should contact their school to exercise their rights and we will work with the parent/guardian and school together to facilitate those requests.
A child's participation or access to an activity on BrainPOP cannot be conditioned on him or her providing more personal information than is reasonably necessary for that activity.
Connecting with BrainPOP:
Contact information for newsletter and surveys:
On pages like our homepage, our Blog, BrainPOP Educators®, and other adult-facing pages of our Services, including pages that do not require log in, adult users may choose to sign up for newsletters, promotional offerings, or participation in surveys, all of which require contact information. The submitted contact information will be used for promotional purposes, and you may opt-out at any time. An opt-out link or instructions on how to opt-out will be included at the bottom of such messages. Registration for newsletters, promotional offerings, and surveys participation are not intended for minors.
Information we collect when you contact us:
When you send us messages through our system or by email or through other online platforms, we collect the information you provide, including your message and any contact information you include. We use and retain such information to respond to your request, facilitate support to you in the future and to optimize our support services. We will respond once to messages from children under age 13 and then we delete those messages and any personally identifiable information contained in them.
Feedback:
Certain features we offer include an option to provide us with feedback. The feedback feature does not identify the user submitting it. If we receive personally identifiable information through a feedback form we take steps to immediately delete that information. We reserve the right to use feedback for any purpose with no obligation to you.
Applying for a job:
all resumes submitted by applicants through our website are submitted through BambooHR. We will only use the information for the application process and in accordance with any other privacy notice on the page in which you enter the job posting.
Information Collected Automatically
We automatically receive and record information on our server logs from a user’s browser.  This may include the IP address, pages of BrainPOP visited, the time spent on those pages, and access times and dates. We use this information to better display our Services, maintain a user’s session, identify the country the user is located in, monitor, analyze use of and administer BrainPOP, and to better tailor it to your needs. We may also use this information to serve advertising to adult users.
To collect this information, we use technological tools including:
Cookies.
A cookie is a small data file sent from a website or application and stored on your computer or device.  Cookies allow us to recognize your browser when you return to BrainPOP, remember your login information, enable access to paid content and monitor potential account misuse.  Cookies also allow us to better understand how you interact with BrainPOP and to monitor aggregated usage. You can set your browser to detect some cookies, to stop accepting cookies or to prompt you before accepting a cookie. Disabling our cookies will prevent access to paid content and limit some of the functionalities within our Services. To learn more about browser cookies, including how to manage or delete them, look in the Tools, Help or similar section of your web browser, or visit
allaboutcookies.org
.
Pixel Tags.
A pixel tag (also known as a “clear GIF” or “web beacon”) is a tiny image – typically just one-pixel – that we place in our marketing emails, newsletters, promotional offerings and surveys. We use pixel tags and line tracking to analyze the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns.
We use Google Analytics to assist us in collecting and assessing automatically collected information. For more information about Google Analytics, see
Google Analytics Terms of Service
and the
Google Privacy Policy
. You can prevent Google Analytics from collecting information about you and recognizing you on return visits to our Services by disabling cookies on your browser or by installing the Google Analytics opt-out plug in. Note that we are not responsible for Google’s opt-out tools.
By using our Services, you agree to our use of these tracking technologies.
We do not track users across unaffiliated sites and services, however, when you use the Internet, unaffiliated parties such as ad networks, web analytics companies and social networking platforms may collect information about your online activities over time and across our and other websites.  This information may be used to provide advertisements for products and services that may interest you, and those companies may use cookies, clear GIFs and other tracking technologies.
In addition, we and our third party partners may use tracking technologies to deliver targeted advertisements and marketing messages to adult users on our or unaffiliated websites and online services. We also occasionally source information about groups of adults to generate a "lookalike audience" or similar audience of prospective customers through advertising platforms. This allows us to target prospective customers with advertisements on their networks who appear to have shared interests or similar demographics to our existing customers, based on the platforms' own data. We do not have access to the identity of anybody in the lookalike audience, unless they choose to click on the ads, and this information is only used for customer prospecting.
To learn about interest-based advertising, “lookalike audiences” and how you can opt-out of these features, you may wish to visit the Network Advertising Initiative’s online resources, at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices
, and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) resources at
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
. Note that if you wish to opt out, you will need to do so separately for each of your devices and for each web browser you use. You may also manage certain advertising cookies by visiting the EU-based Your Online Choices at
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. You may also be able to limit interest-based advertising through the settings on your mobile device by selecting “limit ad tracking” (iOS) or “opt-out of interest based ads” (Android). You may also be able to opt-out of some – but not all – interest-based ads served by mobile ad networks by visiting
http://youradchoices.com/appchoices
and downloading the mobile AppChoices app.
We also subscribe to various third parties’ education market information and databases, for example databases of school contacts. We use this data to learn about the industry we serve, to improve our services and for direct marketing. Some third-parties may provide us pseudonymized information about you (such as demographic information or sites where you have been shown ads) from offline and online sources that we may use to provide you more relevant and useful advertising.
Push notifications on mobile apps:
Our adult users have the option to accept push notifications. If push notifications are accepted, we will store your previously provided name and email address in the push notification token. If you choose to receive push notifications, we will need to collect certain information about your device - such as operating system and user identification information - in order to ensure they are delivered properly. We also collect the user time zone, which is set on the device, to ensure that we send notifications at an appropriate time of the day. We do not combine this information with other PII. You may turn push notifications off at any time using your device controls.
How We Use Artificial Intelligence (AI)
BrainPOP Science® users have access to our Claims, Evidence, Reasoning (CER) model AI-assisted grading tool (“AI Grading Tool”). The AI Grading Tool uses a custom AI model to analyze student responses on CER assignments. It provides scoring suggestions and explanations to help you, the teacher, assess student work more efficiently.
We actively develop our AI features to be ethical and transparent, ensuring responsible use for everyone. The AI Grading Tool provides suggested scores and feedback based on the CER rubric. However, teachers have full control and can always modify or override AI-generated results. Students only see teacher-approved final scores. We never share Personally Identifiable student data or use Student Records to train any third-party AI models. We use Google's Vertex AI within a highly secure environment to protect student data. The AI Grading Tool only analyzes student responses for scoring purposes. We may use de-identified or aggregated student data to make the AI Grading Tool more accurate and helpful in the future.
Opt-Out Option: Teachers can hide the AI Grading Tool on their accounts if they do not want the input from the AI Grading Tool. For complete disabling of the feature and use of Students Records, please contact
legal@brainpop.com
or use the setting to opt out if available (note: we will add a settings option for Administrators in future updates).
We encourage teachers to provide us feedback on the AI Grading Tool. We'll use this to guide future improvements.
How Long We Retain Personal Information:
Districts, schools and homeschools are able to delete student personally identifiable information at any time and in real time using the Administrator dashboard as mentioned above. Once that information is deleted, it is deleted from our servers – first from our servers and then, after two weeks later, from any back-up server. If information was not deleted by the school or the district before the subscription expired, we retain such information for a limited period of six months after expiration.
Student classroom accounts and the student identifiable information within them are automatically deleted after two years of inactivity - first from our server and then, two weeks later, from any back-up server. At that point it cannot be restored. Students that are no longer at the school and removed by the admin, are deleted after 7 days.
Teacher accounts will be deleted after one year of inactivity.
If your jurisdiction requires the deletion of student data within a shorter time period, or upon immediate termination of the subscription, you are required to delete such data using the Administrator dashboard as mentioned above or contact us for assistance at
legal@brainpop.com
.
Districts and schools may request copies of their student personal information (which includes an CSV template file of names, classes and quiz scores), which shall be provided within four (4) weeks of the written request.
Individual accounts created on the BrainPOP Home subscription will automatically be deleted after three (3) months after the expiration of the subscription.
We will retain, use and share anonymous or aggregate and de-identified information for lawfully permissible purposes, including developing and improving educational products and services, educational research purposes, evaluating, informing and demonstrating the effectiveness and efficacy of our products and services.
How We Share Your Information
We may provide Personally Identifiable Information to our partners, business affiliates, and third party service providers who work for BrainPOP and operate some of its functionalities. These may include hosting, streaming, credit card processing services and companies that provide marketing emails on our behalf. A current list of these third parties service providers is available to our subscribers upon request through
privacy@brainpop.com
. These third parties service providers are bound contractually to practice commercially reasonable security measures and to use your Personally Identifiable Information solely as it pertains to the provision of their services. They do not have the independent right to share your Personally Identifiable Information or use it for any unrelated purposes.
We reserve the right to disclose personally identifiable information if we are required to do so by law, or if we believe that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, protect your safety or others' safety, investigate fraud, and/or comply with a judicial proceeding, court order, subpoena, or legal process.
We also reserve the right to transfer your Personally Identifiable Information in case of a corporate restructuring (such as a merger, acquisition or other disposition of our business), as long as the receiving entity adopts this Privacy Policy regarding your information.
We may share teachers’, administrators’ and parents’ email addresses collected when registering to free trials with third parties business partners for marketing purposes when the individual has opted in to receive such communication. You may opt out of promotional messaging at any time as described in the Opt Out section below.
Security
We strive to maintain security policies and procedures that are designed to protect your information.
Our servers are located in a secured, locked, and monitored environment to prevent unauthorized entry or theft, and are protected by a firewall. The servers are located in a data center in the United States and backed up daily to a secure, U.S.-based, off-site data center.
We apply a Secure Sockets Layer (SSL or HTTPS) encrypting technology to encrypt data in transit between the server and the browser remains encrypted. We also encrypt the data at rest.
Governance policies and access controls are in place to ensure that the information of each district, school, or other subscriber is separated, and all subscribers can only access their own data.
Only limited BrainPOP personnel have access to the database, and personnel only access it when necessary to provide services. Personnel with access to Student Records pass criminal or other background checks and undergo periodic privacy training.
We follow standardized and documented procedures for coding, configuration management, patch installation, and change management for all applicable servers, and we have a third party audit our practices at least once a year.
While we strive to maintain industry-standard privacy and security practices, it should be noted that no industry system is fail proof, and we are not responsible for security incidents not reasonably foreseeable or reasonably within our control. In the event of unauthorized access to Personally Identifiable Information, we will notify the affected subscriber(s) in accordance with applicable law, and as appropriate, coordinate with the subscriber to support notification of affected individuals, students, and families.
Links to Third Party Sites
While using our Services, you may be referred to or linked from or to third party sites, such as educational partners whose games are included on our GameUp® portal. While we contractually require our third parties partners to adhere to our privacy policies, you should keep in mind that once you leave BrainPOP and visit a third party site, our privacy policy is no longer in effect. We are not responsible for information, content, terms of use, or privacy policies on these other sites. By browsing and interacting with any other website, you are subject to that website's own rules and policies. Please read those rules and policies carefully before proceeding. Please also keep in mind that you do have the option to block third party links. To do so, please contact our support team at
privacy@brainpop.com
.
Social Networks:
Adult facing pages within our Services contain social network sharing plug ins or widgets. These plugins may provide information to their associated social networks or third-parties about your interactions with our web pages that you visit, even if you do not click on or otherwise interact with the plug-in or widget. Information is transmitted from your browser and may include an identifier assigned by the social network or third party, information about your browser type, operating system, device type, IP address, and the URL of the web page where widget appears. If you use social network tools or visit social networking websites, you should read their privacy disclosures, to learn what information they collect, use, and share. We are not responsible for information, content, terms of use, or privacy policies at these social networks or third party sites.
Opt Out
If you have subscribed to receive marketing messaging from us, or if you receive an unwanted email from us, you can opt-out of receiving future emails by clicking the opt-out link in the email or alternatively by sending an email to
legal@brainpop.com
, with “Opt out” in the subject line. We will process your request within a reasonable time after receipt. Note that you will continue to receive operational emails regarding the products or services you are subscribed to.
For California Residents
As a California resident, you have certain rights regarding your personal information. These rights include:
Right to Know and Access Information: You may request access to the personal information we maintain about you in the ordinary course of business. This may include what personal information we collect, use, or disclose about you. We may not fulfill some or all of your request to access as permitted by applicable law.
Right to Deletion: You may request that we delete your personal information. Depending on the scope of your request, we may refrain from granting your request, as permitted by applicable law. For example, we may be legally required to retain your information in our business records.
Right to Opt Out of the Sale of Your Personal Information: California law considers certain uses of personal information, such as sharing your personal information with a third party in order to serve ads to you to be a “sale.” We do not sell personal information of children or students. However we do engage in some marketing behavior with data from adults that would be considered a “sale” under California law. You may request to opt-out of that use of your information by using the methods provided below or via
this form.
In order to prevent unauthorized access to your information, we are required by law to verify your identity before we may address your request.
To Exercise Your Rights
BrainPOP is used in schools at the direction of our Customers. In addition, we are obligated under FERPA to remain under the direct control of our Customers with respect to our use and maintenance of student personal information that is part of the education record. As such, if you use BrainPOP through a school account and wish to exercise your rights in respect to student personal information, please contact your education institution and we will work with them to facilitate your request.
All other BrainPOP users and visitors may exercise these rights by:
Calling us at Toll free phone number: 866-54-BRAIN (866-542-7246)
Emailing us at
legal@brainpop.com
Visiting
https://educators.brainpop.com/contact-us/contact-legal/
Or mailing us at BrainPOP, Attn: Legal Department, 71 W 23rd Street, 17th Floor, New York, NY 10010.
Your exercise of the above rights is subject to certain exemptions to safeguard the public interest and our interests. Requests to exercise these rights may be granted in whole, in part, or not at all, depending on the scope and nature of the request and applicable law. Where required by applicable law, we will notify you if and why we are unable to fulfill your request.
Non-discrimination:
We shall not discriminate or otherwise penalize anyone for exercising their rights.
Categories of Personal information we collect
Identifiers such as a real name, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, billing address, and phone number. Your name, address, phone number and billing information may also considered personal information under subdivision (e) of California Business and Professions Code Section 1798.80
Internet or other electronic network activity information regarding your interaction with BrainPOP
Geolocation information in the form of your country
Education information, defined as information that is not publicly available personally identifiable information as defined in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99).
For adult users, we also collect:
Commercial information, including records of products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an Internet Web site, application, or advertisement.
Categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected
We collect Personal Information directly from the Customer, teacher and from student users.
We also collect Personal Information about adult users and customer prospects from third parties’ education market information and databases, for example databases of school contacts.
We collect this information directly from you, from our business partners and affiliates, from your browser or device when you visit our websites, or from third parties that you permit to share information with us.
Business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling Personal Information
We collect your Personal Information to provide the services and for the following business purposes:
Performing services in accordance with our contract with the Customer and the terms of use including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, and processing payments.
Detecting security incidents, protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecuting those responsible for that activity.
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
Sending you product communications.
Categories of third parties with whom we share Personal Information
We share personal information with service providers who support us in delivering the Services as described above.
For our adult users, we also share personal information with "third parties" as the term is defined in CCPA for targeted marketing purposes.
Specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected
Education Products Subscribers:
Administrators, educators and parents: full name, email address, phone number, username, password, school, school address (or home if parents), classes associated with the account, IP address, and unique identifier for certain single sign on services login integrations
Students: full name, username, password, school and classes associated with the account, graduation year/grade, voice recording (if using Make-a-Movie recording feature), IP address, and email and unique identifier for certain single sign on services login integrations
Connecting with BrainPOP: name, email address, other contact information, IP address
Website visitors: IP address, pseudonymous end user identifiers
Authorized Agent: California residents may use an authorized agent on their behalf to exercise a privacy right discussed above. If you are an authorized agent acting on behalf of a California resident to communicate with us or to exercise a privacy right discussed above, you must be able to demonstrate that you have the requisite authorization to act on behalf of the resident and have sufficient access to their laptop, desktop, or mobile device to exercise these rights digitally. If you are an authorized agent trying to exercise rights on behalf of a BrainPOP user, please contact the user's school or district with supporting verification information, which includes a valid Power of Attorney in the State of California, proof that you have access to the user’s device, and proof of your own identity.
Using BrainPOP® Outside the US
If you are using the Services outside the United States, you consent to having your information and data transferred to the United States. If you are in any jurisdiction with laws or regulations governing internet use, including collection, use, and disclosure of personal data, different from those of the United States, you may only use the Services in a manner that is lawful in your jurisdiction. If your use of the Services may be unlawful in your jurisdiction, please do not use them. If your use of the individual accounts may be unlawful in your jurisdiction, please do not use it.
Please note that BrainPOP complies and requires its users to comply with U.S. sanctions and export control restrictions. You agree not to use our Services in any country or jurisdiction subject to US comprehensive sanctions, including but not limited to, Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria, Iran, Venezuela, and the Donetsk, Luhansk, and Crimea regions of Ukraine, without written approval from BrainPOP. You further agree that you are not subject to any sanction, restriction or prohibition that has been imposed by the United States or any other applicable jurisdiction.
Using BrainPOP® From the EU
BrainPOP processes your information in one of two capacities, either: (i) as a Data Controller for our own internal business operations, such as sales, marketing, administration etc., or (ii) as a Data Processor when carrying out our Services for our school customers using individual accounts.
As a Data Controller, BrainPOP processes your personal data, in accordance with applicable law, for the following purposes:
track your interaction with our emails we send, so we can see if they are working as intended;
sending you marketing communications/placing marketing calls, in order to keep you informed of our products and services, which we consider may be of interest to you;
to comply with applicable law, for example, in response to a request from a court or regulatory body, where such request is made in accordance with the law; and
where necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court procedure; and
offer our goods to you in a personalized way, for example, we may provide suggestions based on your personal data to enable you to identify suitable goods and services.
The bases for processing of your personal data for the purposes described above will include:
you provided us with your consent;
for BrainPOP’s legitimate business interests as outlined in paragraphs a., b. (where this does not include B2C email or phone marketing communications), d. and e. above; or
for compliance with a legal or statutory obligation to which BrainPOP is subject.
Your personal data will be retained as long as is reasonably necessary for the purposes listed above or as required by applicable local law.  Retention periods can vary based on the type of information and how it is used.
What Are Your Rights Under the GDPR?
Parents/guardians of children using BrainPOP through a school account should contact their school to exercise their rights and we will work with the parent/guardian and school together to facilitate those requests.
When we are operating as a Controller, we provide you with certain rights related to your personal data.  To exercise your rights, please contact us at
accessrequests@brainpop.com
. We will respond to your request within a reasonable time frame.
Please note that the rules in your country may provide you with additional rights or may limit the rights noted below.  In all cases, we will comply with the applicable laws.
Right of access
You may have the right to obtain confirmation about whether or we process your personal data, and when we do, to request access to that personal data. The access information includes the purposes of processing, the categories of personal data involved, and the recipients or categories of recipients to whom the personal data have been or will be disclosed. However, this is not an absolute right and the interests of other individuals may restrict your right of access.
You may have the right to obtain a copy of the personal data undergoing processing. For further copies requested by you, we may charge a reasonable fee based on administrative costs.
Right to rectification
You may have the right to rectify inaccurate personal data concerning you. Depending on the purposes of the processing, you may have the right to have incomplete personal data completed, including by means of providing a supplementary statement.
Right to erasure
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to obtain from us the erasure of personal data concerning you and we may be obliged to erase that personal data.
Right to restriction of processing
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to restrict processing your personal data. In this case, the respective data will be marked and may only be processed by us for certain purposes.
Right to data portability
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to receive the personal data concerning you, which you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and you may have the right to transmit those data to another entity without hindrance from us.
Right to object
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to object, on grounds relating to your particular situation, or where Personal Data are processed for direct marketing purposes at any time to the processing of your Personal Data by us and we can be required to no longer process your Personal Data.
Moreover, if your Personal Data is processed for direct marketing purposes, you have the right to object at any time to the processing of Personal Data concerning you for such marketing, which includes profiling to the extent that it is related to such direct marketing. In this case your Personal Data will no longer be processed for such purposes by us.
If you have concerns or complaints you may have a right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
Since BrainPOP transfers, stores and processes EU customers’ information outside of the EU, into the U.S., such transfers are based on the Standard Contractual Clauses (“SCC”) as set forth under GDPR regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information from European Union, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom to the United States. To request execution of the SCC Agreement, please contact us at
privacy@brainpop.com
. For information on the different purposes for which personal data are processed with the categories of personal data and the legal grounds for which they are done, please review the table in previous section of this Privacy Policy.
Using BrainPOP® From Australia
We encourage schools in Australia to use our privacy notice (
https://www.brainpop.com/about/australia_notice
) to inform parents/guardians of our products and practices. This notice conforms to the notice requirements under the Australian Privacy Principles (APPs) 8 – cross-border disclosure of personal information.
Privacy question?
If you have any questions, comments or complaints about our collection, use or disclosure of your information, or if you believe that we have not complied with this privacy policy or the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth), you can contact us at
accessrequests@brainpop.com
. If you are not satisfied with the outcome of our assessment of your complaint, you may wish to contact the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
Changes to this policy or any of the pages linked in this policy may be required in order to address changing technology and threats, changing laws, or as we release new or amended services. Should we make material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will provide notice and request your consent. In the event of any non-material changes, we will provide prominent notice as required by law. Posting the modified privacy policy on our Services and providing notice as stated above will give effect to the revised Privacy Policy Your continued use of the Services constitutes your acceptance of any revised Privacy Policy. If you do not agree to the revised Privacy Policy, please refrain from using the Services and/or leave this website(s) or app(s).
Contact information
If you have any questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy, please contact us by either:
Email at
privacy@brainpop.com
Mail at BrainPOP, Attn: Legal Department, 71 W 23rd Street, 17th Floor, New York, NY 10010.
Toll free phone number: 866-54-BRAIN (866-542-7246)
Message through
here
If you wish to report a security breach, please contact us at
security@brainpop.com
.
Please click on this link to view the previous version of our Privacy Policy, in effect before July 21, 2024.
Translations
The Privacy Policy is also available in
Spanish
and
French
. Please note that the English version shall prevail in the case of any conflict between them.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://studentprivacypledge.org/privacy-pledge/:
Skip to Main Content
Legacy Privacy Pledge
Note: An updated version of the Student Privacy Pledge – Pledge 2020 – is available at
this link
.
K-12 School Service Provider Pledge to Safeguard Student Privacy
Download a PDF copy of the Pledge
K-12 school service providers are honored to be entrusted by educators and families to support their educational needs and school operations. School service providers take responsibility to both support the effective use of student information and safeguard student privacy and information security.
School service providers support schools – including their teachers, students and parents – to manage student data, carry out school operations, support instruction and learning opportunities, and develop and improve products/services intended for educational/school use. In so doing, it is critical that schools and school service providers build trust by effectively protecting the privacy of student information and communicating with parents about how student information is used and safeguarded.
We pledge to carry out responsible stewardship and appropriate use of student personal information according to the commitments below and in adherence to all laws applicable to us as school service providers.
We Commit To:
✘
Not collect, maintain, use or share student personal information beyond that needed for authorized educational/school purposes, or as authorized by the parent/student.
✘
Not sell student personal information.
✘
Not use or disclose student information collected through an educational/school service (whether personal information or otherwise) for behavioral targeting of advertisements to students.
✘
Not build a personal profile of a student other than for supporting authorized educational/school purposes or as authorized by the parent/student.
✘
Not make material changes to school service provider consumer privacy policies without first providing prominent notice to the account holder(s) (i.e., the educational institution/agency, or the parent/student when the information is collected directly from the student with student/parent consent) and allowing them choices before data is used in any manner inconsistent with terms they were initially provided; and not make material changes to other policies or practices governing the use of student personal information that are inconsistent with contractual requirements.
✘
Not knowingly retain student personal information beyond the time period required to support the authorized educational/school purposes, or as authorized by the parent/student.
✔
Collect, use, share, and retain student personal information only for purposes for which we were authorized by the educational institution/agency, teacher or the parent/student.
✔
Disclose clearly in contracts or privacy policies, including in a manner easy for parents to understand, what types of student personal information we collect, if any, and the purposes for which the information we maintain is used or shared with third parties.
✔
Support access to and correction of student personally identifiable information by the student or their authorized parent, either by assisting the educational institution in meeting its requirements or directly when the information is collected directly from the student with student/parent consent.
✔
Maintain a comprehensive security program that is reasonably designed to protect the security, privacy, confidentiality, and integrity of student personal information against risks – such as unauthorized access or use, or unintended or inappropriate disclosure – through the use of administrative, technological, and physical safeguards appropriate to the sensitivity of the information.
✔
Require that our vendors with whom student personal information is shared in order to deliver the educational service, if any, are obligated to implement these same commitments for the given student personal information.
✔
Allow a successor entity to maintain the student personal information, in the case of our merger or acquisition by another entity, provided the successor entity is subject to these same commitments for the previously collected student personal information.
Notes:
Some school service providers may be subject to additional legal obligations, contractual commitments, or requests from educational institutions or parents/students that direct or otherwise authorize additional uses of student data, other than those specified above.
Nothing in this pledge is intended to prohibit the use of student personal information for purposes of adaptive learning or customized education.
This pledge is intended to be applicable to new contracts and policies going forward and addressed — where inconsistent and as agreed to by the educational institution or agency — in existing contracts as updated over time.
This pledge shall be effective as of January 1, 2015.
Definitions:
‘School service provider’ refers to any entity that: (1) is providing, and is operating in its capacity as a provider of, an online or mobile application, online service or website that is both designed and marketed for use in United States elementary and secondary educational institutions/ agencies and is used at the direction of their teachers or other employees; and (2) collects, maintains or uses student personal information in digital/electronic format. The term ‘school service provider’ does not include an entity that is providing, and that is operating in its capacity as a provider of, general audience software, applications, services or websites not designed and marketed for schools.
‘Educational/School purposes’ are services or functions that customarily take place at the direction of the educational institution/agency or their teacher/employee, for which the institutions or agency would otherwise use its own employees, and that aid in the administration or improvement of educational and school activities (e.g., instruction, administration, and development and improvement of products/services intended for educational/school use).
‘Student personal information’ is personally identifiable information as well as other information when it is both collected and maintained on an individual level and is linked to personally identifiable information.
‘Student’ applies to students of United States elementary and secondary schools, and with regard to notice and consent applies only to students of appropriate age as authorized under relevant United States federal law.
‘Consumer privacy policies’ include those privacy policies that are posted by the company to be available to all users to the site or service.
‘Parent’ includes a student’s legal guardian.
This Pledge is neither intended as a comprehensive privacy policy nor to be inclusive of all requirements to achieve compliance with all applicable federal or state laws. For more information, visit
https://studentprivacypledge.org
.
The Pledge
Expand Navigation
Legacy Privacy Pledge
Privacy Pledge (Spanish)
Apply To The Pledge
Signatories
Guidelines & FAQs
Press Releases
Close Modal
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 2
https://www.brainpop.com/about/privacy_policy_june2024:
About cookies on this site
We use cookies to collect and analyze information on site performance and usage, and to enhance and customize content and advertisements only for appropriate audiences.
Learn more
Allow all cookies
Cookie settings
Cookie settings
Cookies used on the site are categorized and below you can read about each category and allow or deny some or all of them. When categories than have been previously allowed are disabled, all cookies assigned to that category will be removed from your browser.
Additionally you can see a list of cookies assigned to each category and detailed information in the cookie declaration.
Learn more
Allow all cookies
Deny all

Necessary cookies
Some cookies are required to provide core functionality. The website won't function properly without these cookies and they are enabled by default and cannot be disabled.

Preferences
Preference cookies enables the web site to remember information to customize how the web site looks or behaves for each user. This may include storing selected currency, region, language or color theme.

Analytical cookies
Analytical cookies help us improve our website by collecting and reporting information on its usage.

Marketing cookies
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites to allow publishers to display relevant and engaging advertisements.
We do not include these cookies on pages directed to kids.
Save settings
×
Free access ends
.
Explore NEW family plans and offers
Free access ends
.
Keep students on track with school access
Free access ends
.
Keep students on track with a school subscription
You have
days left! Extend your free trial up to 90 days by
inviting more teachers
You have
days left!
Contact Sales
Log In
I'm a kid
I'm a grown-up
Log In
I'm a kid
I'm a grown-up
Contact Sales
https://static.brainpop.com/
You don’t have any notifications yet!
×
Please enable JavaScript on your browser. View our
Tech Support FAQ
for more information.
Search in brainpop
Add a search term to continue
Log In
Privacy Policy
We design and operate our technology and services with our users’ protection and privacy in mind, and we make every effort to be transparent in our data collection and use practices.
Our flagship education products include individual accounts that enable schools and parents to keep track of individual student learning and maintain control over their student data.
We do not use student or children’s personal information for advertising purposes, including targeted advertising.
We do not rent or sell student data.
BrainPOP uses industry standard protocol to ensure that student data is encrypted and transmitted securely from end to end and at rest.
We limit the data collected from students or children to only that which is necessary to meet the educational purposes of BrainPOP.
We do not collect sensitive data like biometric or health data or behavior data.
Students cannot interact with other users outside their school, classroom or family account. The product is not intended and does not allow for social interactions between students.
Districts, schools and homeschools are able to delete student personally identifiable information at any time.
We are proud supporters of the
K-12 School Service Provider Pledge to Safeguard Student Privacy.
We provide prominent notice to users and send out email notices to customers before making any material changes to our Privacy Policy.
BrainPOP complies with the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA).
BrainPOP agrees to operate as a school official as the term is used in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA), and operates at the direct control of our school and district customers with respect to our use and handling of their student records.
Privacy Questions?
If you have questions or complaints regarding our privacy policy or practices, please contact us at
privacy@brainpop.com
.
Privacy Policy
Last updated June 9th, 2023.
This privacy policy applies to all the BrainPOP and its affiliates (“BrainPOP”) owned and operated websites and mobile applications (which we collectively refer to as “Services”). By accessing or using our Services, you agree to the terms of this Privacy Policy.
Definitions
For purposes of this policy, we will use the following definitions:
Personally identifiable information (PII)
is information that can identify a user of the Services, including his or her e-mail, name, and address. It also includes PII combined with non-PII.
De-identified information
is information from which personally identifiable components have been removed and a reasonable determination made that an individual is not identifiable.
Student Records
are records that are directly related to a student and maintained by BrainPOP on behalf of a school or district subscriber.
What Type of Information Do We Collect and Why?
Education Product Subscribers:
Information collected during the subscription process:
During the registration process for any of our subscriptions, we ask the subscriber to provide us with a name, email address, school or district affiliation (when applicable), phone number, and billing information. We may also ask you to provide username and password. We use the information to create and service the account, fulfill the subscription and send you service-related announcements. For instance, we may send emails about routine maintenance, new feature launches or product recommendations related to your subscription. We may also use this contact information to request feedback on our products and services, to inform future customer service and product improvements. If you are registering for a free trial, we will use the information to create a free trial account and to send occasional promotional emails and other marketing campaigns. You may opt out of promotional email messaging at any time as described in the Opt Out section below.
BrainPOP at Schools:
Whether engaging with BrainPOP through a free trial or a paid subscription, schools or districts are required to appoint an administrator (“Administrator”), who is authorized by the school or the district to be responsible for the Students Records.
Each school or district Administrator has access to a dashboard that allows them to create, update, review, modify and delete individual accounts, and monitor logins within the individual accounts.
To create the teacher accounts, we require a full name, email address, class name, and a password security question. We also use the email address to send product updates and use recommendations, password recovery information, effectiveness and efficacy data, invitations to participate in surveys and research and more (messaging may not be available in all jurisdictions). An unsubscribe option is included in promotional messaging.
If a school or district uses and accesses individual accounts through any of the single sign on services that we support, we collect the information we use for the individual accounts function from the third party integrated service.
Students:
Students accounts can be created by the school, the district, or by the teachers, or the teacher can invite the students to create the accounts using a class code provided by the teacher. We collect students’ full name, class, graduation year/grade, username, password and may collect student school email addresses and other teacher and student unique identifiers for certain single sign on services login integrations. Students will be able to store their activities, quizzes, movies and other projects they’ve created and correspondences with their teachers within their individual accounts. We collect student’s voice-recording if they use the recording feature in Make-a-Movie®. Students cannot interact with other users outside their school or classroom subscription. Students’ PII is not posted publicly. Student emails shall only be used for the purposes of providing login integration. We will not send emails to students, for any reason.
BrainPOP at Home:
To create a family subscription for home use, parents or legal guardians are asked to provide their full name, email address and other minimally required personal information.
For family subscriptions that permit individual accounts, we also ask parents or guardians for their children’s name (first or full name, depending on product),  graduation year/grade, username, password and security question(s),  an avatar image, when applicable. We use this information to create the individual child accounts. Some of the family subscriptions allow children to store their activities, quizzes, movies and other projects they created, and badges or goals they have achieved, and the Homeschool subscription allows for children to correspond with the parent/guardian within the Services. Children cannot interact with other users outside their family or homeschool subscription. Children PII is not posted publicly.
Parents or guardians subscribing to the family products will receive occasional emails with information about usage of the accounts, new features, product use recommendations, effectiveness and efficacy testing, backup schedules, survey and research participation invitation and more. An opt-out will be included at the bottom of promotional messaging.
Children under Age 13:
In compliance with the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), BrainPOP does not collect personally identifiable information from children under 13, without a parent or guardian's consent, or that of a school if applicable. Parents and guardians of children under 13 who use any of the BrainPOP products have certain rights under COPPA and BrainPOP recognizes those rights. At any time, parents/guardians using a home product may request to review the personal information we collected from their child, request that we make no further use of that information or request that we delete it. To exercise your right to delete information, please use the contact information below. Parents/guardians of children using BrainPOP through a school account should contact their school to exercise their rights and we will work with the parent/guardian and school together to facilitate those requests.
A child's participation or access to an activity on BrainPOP cannot be conditioned on him or her providing more personal information than is reasonably necessary for that activity.
Connecting with BrainPOP:
Contact information for newsletter and surveys:
On pages like our homepage, our Blog, BrainPOP Educators®, and other adult-facing pages of our Services, including pages that do not require log in, adult users may choose to sign up for newsletters, promotional offerings, or participation in surveys, all of which require contact information. The submitted contact information will be used for promotional purposes, and you may opt-out at any time. An opt-out link or instructions on how to opt-out will be included at the bottom of such messages. Registration for newsletters, promotional offerings, and surveys participation are not intended for minors.
Information we collect when you contact us:
When you send us messages through our system or by email or through other online platforms, we collect the information you provide, including your message and any contact information you include. We use and retain such information to respond to your request, facilitate support to you in the future and to optimize our support services. We will respond once to messages from children under age 13 and then we delete those messages and any personally identifiable information contained in them.
Feedback:
Certain features we offer include an option to provide us with feedback. The feedback feature does not identify the user submitting it. If we receive personally identifiable information through a feedback form we take steps to immediately delete that information. We reserve the right to use feedback for any purpose with no obligation to you.
Applying for a job:
all resumes submitted by applicants through our website are submitted through BambooHR. We will only use the information for the application process and in accordance with any other privacy notice on the page in which you enter the job posting.
Information Collected Automatically
We automatically receive and record information on our server logs from a user’s browser.  This may include the IP address, pages of BrainPOP visited, the time spent on those pages, and access times and dates. We use this information to better display our Services, maintain a user’s session, identify the country the user is located in, monitor, analyze use of and administer BrainPOP, and to better tailor it to your needs. We may also use this information to serve advertising to adult users.
To collect this information, we use technological tools including:
Cookies.
A cookie is a small data file sent from a website or application and stored on your computer or device.  Cookies allow us to recognize your browser when you return to BrainPOP, remember your login information, enable access to paid content and monitor potential account misuse.  Cookies also allow us to better understand how you interact with BrainPOP and to monitor aggregated usage. You can set your browser to detect some cookies, to stop accepting cookies or to prompt you before accepting a cookie. Disabling our cookies will prevent access to paid content and limit some of the functionalities within our Services. To learn more about browser cookies, including how to manage or delete them, look in the Tools, Help or similar section of your web browser, or visit
allaboutcookies.org
.
Pixel Tags.
A pixel tag (also known as a “clear GIF” or “web beacon”) is a tiny image – typically just one-pixel – that we place in our marketing emails, newsletters, promotional offerings and surveys. We use pixel tags and line tracking to analyze the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns.
We use Google Analytics to assist us in collecting and assessing automatically collected information. For more information about Google Analytics, see
Google Analytics Terms of Service
and the
Google Privacy Policy
. You can prevent Google Analytics from collecting information about you and recognizing you on return visits to our Services by disabling cookies on your browser or by installing the Google Analytics opt-out plug in. Note that we are not responsible for Google’s opt-out tools.
By using our Services, you agree to our use of these tracking technologies.
We do not track users across unaffiliated sites and services, however, when you use the Internet, unaffiliated parties such as ad networks, web analytics companies and social networking platforms may collect information about your online activities over time and across our and other websites.  This information may be used to provide advertisements for products and services that may interest you, and those companies may use cookies, clear GIFs and other tracking technologies.
In addition, we and our third party partners may use tracking technologies to deliver targeted advertisements and marketing messages to adult users on our or unaffiliated websites and online services. We also occasionally source information about groups of adults to generate a "lookalike audience" or similar audience of prospective customers through advertising platforms. This allows us to target prospective customers with advertisements on their networks who appear to have shared interests or similar demographics to our existing customers, based on the platforms' own data. We do not have access to the identity of anybody in the lookalike audience, unless they choose to click on the ads, and this information is only used for customer prospecting.
To learn about interest-based advertising, “lookalike audiences” and how you can opt-out of these features, you may wish to visit the Network Advertising Initiative’s online resources, at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices
, and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) resources at
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
. Note that if you wish to opt out, you will need to do so separately for each of your devices and for each web browser you use. You may also manage certain advertising cookies by visiting the EU-based Your Online Choices at
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. You may also be able to limit interest-based advertising through the settings on your mobile device by selecting “limit ad tracking” (iOS) or “opt-out of interest based ads” (Android). You may also be able to opt-out of some – but not all – interest-based ads served by mobile ad networks by visiting
http://youradchoices.com/appchoices
and downloading the mobile AppChoices app.
We also subscribe to various third parties’ education market information and databases, for example databases of school contacts. We use this data to learn about the industry we serve, to improve our services and for direct marketing. Some third-parties may provide us pseudonymized information about you (such as demographic information or sites where you have been shown ads) from offline and online sources that we may use to provide you more relevant and useful advertising.
Push notifications on mobile apps:
Our adult users have the option to accept push notifications. If push notifications are accepted, we will store your previously provided name and email address in the push notification token. If you choose to receive push notifications, we will need to collect certain information about your device - such as operating system and user identification information - in order to ensure they are delivered properly. We also collect the user time zone, which is set on the device, to ensure that we send notifications at an appropriate time of the day. We do not combine this information with other PII. You may turn push notifications off at any time using your device controls.
How Long We Retain Personal Information:
Districts, schools and homeschools are able to delete student personally identifiable information at any time and in real time using the Administrator dashboard as mentioned above. Once that information is deleted, it is deleted from our servers – first from our servers and then, after two weeks later, from any back-up server. If information was not deleted by the school or the district before the subscription expired, we retain such information for a limited period of six months after expiration.
Student classroom accounts and the student identifiable information within them are automatically deleted after two years of inactivity - first from our server and then, two weeks later, from any back-up server. At that point it cannot be restored.
If your jurisdiction requires the deletion of student data within a shorter time period, or upon immediate termination of the subscription, you are required to delete such data using the Administrator dashboard as mentioned above or contact us for assistance at
legal@brainpop.com
.
Districts and schools may request copies of their student personal information (which includes an CSV template file of names, classes and quiz scores), which shall be provided within four (4) weeks of the written request.
Individual accounts created on the BrainPOP Home subscription will automatically be deleted after three (3) months after the expiration of the subscription.
We will retain, use and share anonymous or aggregate and de-identified information for lawfully permissible purposes, including developing and improving educational products and services, educational research purposes, evaluating, informing and demonstrating the effectiveness and efficacy of our products and services.
How We Share Your Information
We may provide Personally Identifiable Information to our partners, business affiliates, and third party service providers who work for BrainPOP and operate some of its functionalities. These may include hosting, streaming, credit card processing services and companies that provide marketing emails on our behalf. A current list of these third parties service providers is available to our subscribers upon request through
privacy@brainpop.com
. These third parties service providers are bound contractually to practice commercially reasonable security measures and to use your Personally Identifiable Information solely as it pertains to the provision of their services. They do not have the independent right to share your Personally Identifiable Information or use it for any unrelated purposes.
We reserve the right to disclose personally identifiable information if we are required to do so by law, or if we believe that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, protect your safety or others' safety, investigate fraud, and/or comply with a judicial proceeding, court order, subpoena, or legal process.
We also reserve the right to transfer your Personally Identifiable Information in case of a corporate restructuring (such as a merger, acquisition or other disposition of our business), as long as the receiving entity adopts this Privacy Policy regarding your information.
We may share teachers’, administrators’ and parents’ email addresses collected when registering to free trials with third parties business partners for marketing purposes when the individual has opted in to receive such communication. You may opt out of promotional messaging at any time as described in the Opt Out section below.
Security
We strive to maintain security policies and procedures that are designed to protect your information.
Our servers are located in a secured, locked, and monitored environment to prevent unauthorized entry or theft, and are protected by a firewall. The servers are located in a data center in the United States and backed up daily to a secure, U.S.-based, off-site data center.
We apply a Secure Sockets Layer (SSL or HTTPS) encrypting technology to encrypt data in transit between the server and the browser remains encrypted. We also encrypt the data at rest.
Governance policies and access controls are in place to ensure that the information of each district, school, or other subscriber is separated, and all subscribers can only access their own data.
Only limited BrainPOP personnel have access to the database, and personnel only access it when necessary to provide services. Personnel with access to Student Records pass criminal background checks and undergo periodic privacy training.
We follow standardized and documented procedures for coding, configuration management, patch installation, and change management for all applicable servers, and we have a third party audit our practices at least once a year.
While we strive to maintain industry-standard privacy and security practices, it should be noted that no industry system is fail proof, and we are not responsible for security incidents not reasonably foreseeable or reasonably within our control. In the event of unauthorized access to Personally Identifiable Information, we will notify the affected subscriber(s) in accordance with applicable law, and as appropriate, coordinate with the subscriber to support notification of affected individuals, students, and families.
Links to Third Party Sites
While using our Services, you may be referred to or linked from or to third party sites, such as educational partners whose games are included on our GameUp® portal. While we contractually require our third parties partners to adhere to our privacy policies, you should keep in mind that once you leave BrainPOP and visit a third party site, our privacy policy is no longer in effect. We are not responsible for information, content, terms of use, or privacy policies on these other sites. By browsing and interacting with any other website, you are subject to that website's own rules and policies. Please read those rules and policies carefully before proceeding. Please also keep in mind that you do have the option to block third party links. To do so, please contact our support team at
privacy@brainpop.com
.
Social Networks:
Adult facing pages within our Services contain social network sharing plug ins or widgets. These plugins may provide information to their associated social networks or third-parties about your interactions with our web pages that you visit, even if you do not click on or otherwise interact with the plug-in or widget. Information is transmitted from your browser and may include an identifier assigned by the social network or third party, information about your browser type, operating system, device type, IP address, and the URL of the web page where widget appears. If you use social network tools or visit social networking websites, you should read their privacy disclosures, to learn what information they collect, use, and share. We are not responsible for information, content, terms of use, or privacy policies at these social networks or third party sites.
Opt Out
If you have subscribed to receive marketing messaging from us, or if you receive an unwanted email from us, you can opt-out of receiving future emails by clicking the opt-out link in the email or alternatively by sending an email to
legal@brainpop.com
, with “Opt out” in the subject line. We will process your request within a reasonable time after receipt. Note that you will continue to receive operational emails regarding the products or services you are subscribed to.
For California Residents
As a California resident, you have certain rights regarding your personal information. These rights include:
Right to Know and Access Information: You may request access to the personal information we maintain about you in the ordinary course of business. This may include what personal information we collect, use, or disclose about you. We may not fulfill some or all of your request to access as permitted by applicable law.
Right to Deletion: You may request that we delete your personal information. Depending on the scope of your request, we may refrain from granting your request, as permitted by applicable law. For example, we may be legally required to retain your information in our business records.
Right to Opt Out of the Sale of Your Personal Information: California law considers certain uses of personal information, such as sharing your personal information with a third party in order to serve ads to you to be a “sale.” We do not sell personal information of children or students. However we do engage in some marketing behavior with data from adults that would be considered a “sale” under California law. You may request to opt-out of that use of your information by using the methods provided below or via
this form.
In order to prevent unauthorized access to your information, we are required by law to verify your identity before we may address your request.
To Exercise Your Rights
BrainPOP is used in schools at the direction of our Customers. In addition, we are obligated under FERPA to remain under the direct control of our Customers with respect to our use and maintenance of student personal information that is part of the education record. As such, if you use BrainPOP through a school account and wish to exercise your rights in respect to student personal information, please contact your education institution and we will work with them to facilitate your request.
All other BrainPOP users and visitors may exercise these rights by:
Calling us at Toll free phone number: 866-54-BRAIN (866-542-7246)
Emailing us at
legal@brainpop.com
Visiting
https://educators.brainpop.com/contact-us/contact-legal/
Or mailing us at BrainPOP, Attn: Legal Department, 71 W 23rd Street, 17th Floor, New York, NY 10010.
Your exercise of the above rights is subject to certain exemptions to safeguard the public interest and our interests. Requests to exercise these rights may be granted in whole, in part, or not at all, depending on the scope and nature of the request and applicable law. Where required by applicable law, we will notify you if and why we are unable to fulfill your request.
Non-discrimination:
We shall not discriminate or otherwise penalize anyone for exercising their rights.
Categories of Personal information we collect
Identifiers such as a real name, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, billing address, and phone number. Your name, address, phone number and billing information may also considered personal information under subdivision (e) of California Business and Professions Code Section 1798.80
Internet or other electronic network activity information regarding your interaction with BrainPOP
Geolocation information in the form of your country
Education information, defined as information that is not publicly available personally identifiable information as defined in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99).
For adult users, we also collect:
Commercial information, including records of products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an Internet Web site, application, or advertisement.
Categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected
We collect Personal Information directly from the Customer, teacher and from student users.
We also collect Personal Information about adult users and customer prospects from third parties’ education market information and databases, for example databases of school contacts.
We collect this information directly from you, from our business partners and affiliates, from your browser or device when you visit our websites, or from third parties that you permit to share information with us.
Business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling Personal Information
We collect your Personal Information to provide the services and for the following business purposes:
Performing services in accordance with our contract with the Customer and the terms of use including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, and processing payments.
Detecting security incidents, protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecuting those responsible for that activity.
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
Sending you product communications.
Categories of third parties with whom we share Personal Information
We share personal information with service providers who support us in delivering the Services as described above.
For our adult users, we also share personal information with "third parties" as the term is defined in CCPA for targeted marketing purposes.
Specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected
Education Products Subscribers:
Administrators, educators and parents: full name, email address, phone number, username, password, school, school address (or home if parents), classes associated with the account, IP address, and unique identifier for certain single sign on services login integrations
Students: full name, username, password, school and classes associated with the account, graduation year/grade, voice recording (if using Make-a-Movie recording feature), IP address, and email and unique identifier for certain single sign on services login integrations
Connecting with BrainPOP: name, email address, other contact information, IP address
Website visitors: IP address, pseudonymous end user identifiers
Authorized Agent: California residents may use an authorized agent on their behalf to exercise a privacy right discussed above. If you are an authorized agent acting on behalf of a California resident to communicate with us or to exercise a privacy right discussed above, you must be able to demonstrate that you have the requisite authorization to act on behalf of the resident and have sufficient access to their laptop, desktop, or mobile device to exercise these rights digitally. If you are an authorized agent trying to exercise rights on behalf of a BrainPOP user, please contact the user's school or district with supporting verification information, which includes a valid Power of Attorney in the State of California, proof that you have access to the user’s device, and proof of your own identity.
Using BrainPOP® Outside the US
If you are using the Services outside the United States, you consent to having your information and data transferred to the United States. If you are in any jurisdiction with laws or regulations governing internet use, including collection, use, and disclosure of personal data, different from those of the United States, you may only use the Services in a manner that is lawful in your jurisdiction. If your use of the Services may be unlawful in your jurisdiction, please do not use them. If your use of the individual accounts may be unlawful in your jurisdiction, please do not use it.
Please note that BrainPOP complies and requires its users to comply with U.S. sanctions and export control restrictions. You agree not to use our Services in any country or jurisdiction subject to US comprehensive sanctions, including but not limited to, Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria, Iran, Venezuela, and the Donetsk, Luhansk, and Crimea regions of Ukraine, without written approval from BrainPOP. You further agree that you are not subject to any sanction, restriction or prohibition that has been imposed by the United States or any other applicable jurisdiction.
Using BrainPOP® From the EU
BrainPOP processes your information in one of two capacities, either: (i) as a Data Controller for our own internal business operations, such as sales, marketing, administration etc., or (ii) as a Data Processor when carrying out our Services for our school customers using individual accounts.
As a Data Controller, BrainPOP processes your personal data, in accordance with applicable law, for the following purposes:
track your interaction with our emails we send, so we can see if they are working as intended;
sending you marketing communications/placing marketing calls, in order to keep you informed of our products and services, which we consider may be of interest to you;
to comply with applicable law, for example, in response to a request from a court or regulatory body, where such request is made in accordance with the law; and
where necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court procedure; and
offer our goods to you in a personalized way, for example, we may provide suggestions based on your personal data to enable you to identify suitable goods and services.
The bases for processing of your personal data for the purposes described above will include:
you provided us with your consent;
for BrainPOP’s legitimate business interests as outlined in paragraphs a., b. (where this does not include B2C email or phone marketing communications), d. and e. above; or
for compliance with a legal or statutory obligation to which BrainPOP is subject.
Your personal data will be retained as long as is reasonably necessary for the purposes listed above or as required by applicable local law.  Retention periods can vary based on the type of information and how it is used.
What Are Your Rights Under the GDPR?
Parents/guardians of children using BrainPOP through a school account should contact their school to exercise their rights and we will work with the parent/guardian and school together to facilitate those requests.
When we are operating as a Controller, we provide you with certain rights related to your personal data.  To exercise your rights, please contact us at
accessrequests@brainpop.com
. We will respond to your request within a reasonable time frame.
Please note that the rules in your country may provide you with additional rights or may limit the rights noted below.  In all cases, we will comply with the applicable laws.
Right of access
You may have the right to obtain confirmation about whether or we process your personal data, and when we do, to request access to that personal data. The access information includes the purposes of processing, the categories of personal data involved, and the recipients or categories of recipients to whom the personal data have been or will be disclosed. However, this is not an absolute right and the interests of other individuals may restrict your right of access.
You may have the right to obtain a copy of the personal data undergoing processing. For further copies requested by you, we may charge a reasonable fee based on administrative costs.
Right to rectification
You may have the right to rectify inaccurate personal data concerning you. Depending on the purposes of the processing, you may have the right to have incomplete personal data completed, including by means of providing a supplementary statement.
Right to erasure
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to obtain from us the erasure of personal data concerning you and we may be obliged to erase that personal data.
Right to restriction of processing
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to restrict processing your personal data. In this case, the respective data will be marked and may only be processed by us for certain purposes.
Right to data portability
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to receive the personal data concerning you, which you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and you may have the right to transmit those data to another entity without hindrance from us.
Right to object
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to object, on grounds relating to your particular situation, or where Personal Data are processed for direct marketing purposes at any time to the processing of your Personal Data by us and we can be required to no longer process your Personal Data.
Moreover, if your Personal Data is processed for direct marketing purposes, you have the right to object at any time to the processing of Personal Data concerning you for such marketing, which includes profiling to the extent that it is related to such direct marketing. In this case your Personal Data will no longer be processed for such purposes by us.
If you have concerns or complaints you may have a right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
Since BrainPOP transfers, stores and processes EU customers’ information outside of the EU, into the U.S., such transfers are based on the Standard Contractual Clauses (“SCC”) as set forth under GDPR regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information from European Union, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom to the United States. To request execution of the SCC Agreement, please contact us at
privacy@brainpop.com
. For information on the different purposes for which personal data are processed with the categories of personal data and the legal grounds for which they are done, please review the table in previous section of this Privacy Policy.
Using BrainPOP® From Australia
We encourage schools in Australia to use our privacy notice (
https://www.brainpop.com/about/australia_notice
) to inform parents/guardians of our products and practices. This notice conforms to the notice requirements under the Australian Privacy Principles (APPs) 8 – cross-border disclosure of personal information.
Privacy question?
If you have any questions, comments or complaints about our collection, use or disclosure of your information, or if you believe that we have not complied with this privacy policy or the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth), you can contact us at
accessrequests@brainpop.com
. If you are not satisfied with the outcome of our assessment of your complaint, you may wish to contact the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
Changes to this policy or any of the pages linked in this policy may be required in order to address changing technology and threats, changing laws, or as we release new or amended services. Should we make material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will provide notice and request your consent. In the event of any non-material changes, we will provide prominent notice as required by law. Posting the modified privacy policy on our Services and providing notice as stated above will give effect to the revised Privacy Policy Your continued use of the Services constitutes your acceptance of any revised Privacy Policy. If you do not agree to the revised Privacy Policy, please refrain from using the Services and/or leave this website(s) or app(s).
Contact information
If you have any questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy, please contact us by either:
Email at
privacy@brainpop.com
Mail at BrainPOP, Attn: Legal Department, 71 W 23rd Street, 17th Floor, New York, NY 10010.
Toll free phone number: 866-54-BRAIN (866-542-7246)
Message through
here
If you wish to report a security breach, please contact us at
security@brainpop.com
.
Please click on this link to view the previous version of our Privacy Policy, in effect before June 9, 2023.
Translations
The Privacy Policy is also available in
Spanish
and
French
. Please note that the English version shall prevail in the case of any conflict between them.